Georgia, session 2025_26, HB571.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 1 -

25 LC 46 1183S
14 SECTION 1.
15 Chapter 34 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to physicians,
16 assistants, and others, is amended by revising subsection (a) of Code Section 43-34-11,
17 relating to continuing education requirement and required training for physicians, as follows:
18 "(a)(1) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of a license,
19 certificate, or permit under this chapter to complete board approved continuing education
20 of not less than 40 hours biennially. The board shall be authorized to approve courses
21 offered by institutions of higher learning, specialty societies, or professional
22 organizations, including, but not limited to, the American Medical Association, the
23 National Medical Association, and the American Osteopathic Association, the number
24 of hours required, and the category in which these hours should be earned. This
25 paragraph shall not apply to respiratory care professionals, persons seeking renewal of
26 certification as respiratory care professionals, clinical perfusionists, persons seeking
27 renewal of licensure as a clinical perfusionist, licensed orthotists or prosthetists, persons
28 seeking renewal of licensure as an orthotist or prosthetist, genetic counselors, or persons
29 seeking renewal of licensure as a genetic counselor, radiologist assistants, or persons
30 seeking renewal of licensure as a radiologist assistant.
31 (2) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of certification as
32 respiratory care professionals under Article 6 of this chapter to complete board approved
33 continuing education. The board shall be authorized to establish the number of hours of
34 continuing education required biennially for renewal of certification as a respiratory care
35 professional and the categories in which these hours should be earned. The board shall
36 be authorized to approve courses offered by institutions of higher learning, specialty
37 societies, or professional organizations. Any action taken by the board pursuant to this
38 paragraph shall be taken in conformity with the provisions of Code Section 43-34-143.
39 (3) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of licensure as
40 clinical perfusionists under Article 7 of this chapter to complete board approved
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 2 -

25 LC 46 1183S
41 continuing education. The board shall be authorized to establish the number of hours of
42 continuing education required biennially for renewal of licensure as a clinical perfusionist
43 and the categories in which these hours should be earned. The board shall be authorized
44 to approve courses offered by institutions of higher learning, specialty societies, or
45 professional organizations. Any action taken by the board pursuant to this paragraph
46 shall be taken in conformity with the provisions of Code Section 43-34-172.
47 (4) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of licensure to
48 practice orthotics or prosthetics under Article 8 of this chapter to complete board
49 approved continuing education. The board shall be authorized to establish the number
50 of hours of continuing education required biennially for renewal of licensure to practice
51 orthotics or prosthetics and the categories in which these hours should be earned,
52 provided that the maximum number of hours of continuing education required for
53 renewal of licensure shall not exceed 40 hours. The board shall be authorized to approve
54 courses offered by institutions of higher learning, specialty societies, or professional
55 organizations. Any action taken by the board pursuant to this paragraph shall be taken
56 in conformity with the provisions of subsection (a) of Code Section 43-34-200.
57 (5) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of licensure to
58 practice genetic counseling under Article 12 of this chapter to complete board approved
59 continuing education. The board shall be authorized to establish the number of hours of
60 continuing education required biennially for renewal of licensure to practice genetic
61 counseling and the categories in which these hours should be earned, provided that the
62 number of hours of continuing education required for renewal of licensure shall not be
63 less than 30 hours biennially. The board shall be authorized to approve courses offered
64 by institutions of higher learning, specialty societies, or professional organizations. Any
65 action taken by the board pursuant to this paragraph shall be taken in conformity with the
66 provisions of subsection (b) of Code Section 43-34-313.
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 3 -

25 LC 46 1183S
67 (6) The board shall be authorized to require persons seeking renewal of licensure to
68 practice as a radiologist assistant under Article 13 of this chapter to complete board
69 approved continuing education. The board shall be authorized to establish the number
70 of hours of continuing education required biennially for renewal of licensure to practice
71 as a radiologist assistant and the categories in which these hours should be earned. The
72 board shall be authorized to approve courses offered by institutions of higher learning,
73 specialty societies, or professional organizations. Any action taken by the board pursuant
74 to this paragraph shall be taken in conformity with the provisions of subsection (b) of
75 Code Section 43-34-334.
76 (6)(7) On and after January 1, 2022, all physicians shall be required to receive one-time
77 education and training, for a minimum of two hours, regarding professional boundaries
78 and physician sexual misconduct. Such education and training shall include subject
79 matter relating to how to proceed with basic as well as sensitive or intimate examinations
80 and the communication with patients that is required as a component of such
81 examinations. Such education and training shall be established by the board and shall be
82 informed by members of the public, as best possible."
83 SECTION 2.
84 Said chapter is further amended by repealing Code Section 43-34-12, relating to radiologist
85 assistant defined.
86 SECTION 3.
87 Said chapter is further amended by adding a new article to read as follows:
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 4 -

25 LC 46 1183S
88 "ARTICLE 13
89 43-34-330.
90 This article shall be known and may be cited as the 'Radiologist Assistant Act.'
91 43-34-331.
92 As used in this article, the term:
93 (1) 'Board' means the Georgia Composite Medical Board.
94 (2) 'Radiologist' means a physician who is licensed to practice medicine pursuant to
95 Article 2 of this chapter and who is certified by the American Board of Radiology, the
96 American Osteopathic Board of Radiology, or the Royal College of Physicians and
97 Surgeons of Canada.
98 (3) 'Radiologist assistant' means an advanced level certified diagnostic radiologic
99 technologist who assists radiologists under the on site direct supervision of a radiologist
100 as defined by the Georgia Composite Medical Board in performing advanced diagnostic
101 imaging procedures as determined by board rule, according to levels of supervision as
102 defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services including, but not limited to,
103 enteral and parenteral procedures when performed under the on site direct supervision of
104 the radiologist and may include injecting diagnostic agents to sites other than intravenous,
105 performing diagnostic aspirations and localizations, and assisting radiologists with other
106 invasive procedures, according to levels of supervision as defined by the Centers for
107 Medicare and Medicaid Services.
108 43-34-332.
109 A person shall be qualified for licensure as a radiologist assistant and the board may issue
110 a license if that person:
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 5 -

25 LC 46 1183S
111 (1) Has applied in writing in form and substance satisfactory to the board and is at least
112 21 years of age;
113 (2) Has not engaged in conduct or activities which would constitute grounds for
114 discipline under this article;
115 (3) Is registered and credentialed as a radiographer with the American Registry of
116 Radiologic Technologists;
117 (4) Is certified and registered:
118 (A) As a radiologist assistant with the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;
119 or
120 (B) As a radiology practitioner assistant with the Certification Board for Radiology
121 Practitioner Assistants and the American Registry of Radiologic Technologists;
122 (5) Has paid the fees required by rule; and
123 (6) Has met any other requirements established by rule.
124 43-34-333.
125 (a) Licenses issued by the board pursuant to this article shall be subject to renewal and
126 shall be valid for up to two years unless otherwise specified by this article and shall be
127 renewable biennially on the renewal date established by the board.
128 (b) The board shall be authorized to, in conformance with paragraph (6) of subsection (a)
129 of Code Section 43-34-11:
130 (1) Require persons seeking renewal of licensure under this article to complete board
131 approved continuing education;
132 (2) Establish the number of hours of continuing education to be completed as well as the
133 categories in which the continuing education is to be completed; and
134 (3) Maintain continued certification and registration as a radiologist assistant with the
135 American Registry of Radiologic technologist or radiology practitioner assistant with the
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 6 -

25 LC 46 1183S
136 Certification Board for Radiology Practitioner Assistants and the American Registry of
137 Radiologic Technologists.
138 (c) A person who has permitted his or her license to expire or who has had his or her
139 license on inactive status may have his or her license restored by:
140 (1) Making application to the board;
141 (2) Filing proof acceptable to the board of his or her fitness to have his or her license
142 restored, including, but not limited to, sworn evidence certifying to active practice in
143 another jurisdiction satisfactory to the board; and
144 (3) Paying the required restoration fee.
145 If the person has not maintained an active practice in another jurisdiction satisfactory to the
146 board, the board shall determine, by an evaluation program established by rule, such
147 person's fitness to resume active status and may require such person to complete a period
148 of evaluated clinical experience and successful completion of an examination.
149 (d) A person who notifies the board on forms prescribed thereby may elect to place his or
150 her license on an inactive status and shall, subject to rules of the board, be excused from
151 payment of renewal fees until he or she notifies the board of his or her desire to resume
152 active status. A person requesting restoration from inactive status shall be required to pay
153 the current renewal fee and shall be required to restore his or her license as provided in
154 subsection (c) of this Code section. A radiologist assistant whose license is on inactive
155 status shall not engage in the scope of practice for radiologist assistants in this state.
156 (e) A person whose license expired while he or she was:
157 (1) In federal service on active duty within the armed forces of the United States or with
158 the state militia and called into service or training; or
159 (2) In training or education under the supervision of the United States preliminary to
160 induction into military service
161 may have his or her license renewed or restored without paying a lapsed renewal fee if,
162 within two years after termination from the service, training, or education except under
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 7 -

25 LC 46 1183S
163 conditions other than honorable, he or she furnishes the board with satisfactory evidence
164 that he or she has been so engaged and that his or her service, training, or education has
165 been terminated.
166 43-34-334.
167 (a) On and after July 1, 2025, a person shall not engage in the scope of practice for
168 radiologist assistants in this state without a valid license issued by the board pursuant to
169 this article.
170 (b) A person shall not hold himself or herself out as a radiologist assistant unless he or she
171 holds a license issued by the board in accordance with this article. A person not licensed
172 by the board pursuant to this article shall not use in connection with his or her name or
173 place of business the terms 'radiologist assistant' or any words, letters, abbreviations, or
174 insignia indicating or implying that the person holds a license as a radiologist assistant.
175 (c) A person who verifies to the board that he or she is employed in this state as a
176 radiologist assistant as of the effective date of this article shall by operation of law be
177 licensed to practice as a radiologist assistant in this state on July 1, 2025.
178 43-34-335.
179 (a) A radiologist may use the services of a radiologist assistant under the on site direct
180 supervision of such radiologist, provided that such radiologist assistant is duly qualified
181 and licensed pursuant to this article.
182 (b) A radiologist assistant shall not interpret images, make diagnoses, or prescribe
183 medications or therapies.
184 (c) Any rules and regulations adopted by the board pertaining to the scope of practice as
185 a radiologist assistant in this state shall be consistent with guidelines adopted by the
186 American College of Radiology, the American Society of Radiologic Technologists, the
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 8 -

25 LC 46 1183S
187 American Registry of Radiologic Technologists, or any other entity deemed appropriate
188 by the board.
189 43-34-336.
190 The board shall have the power and responsibility to:
191 (1) Determine the qualifications and fitness of applicants for licensure and renewal of
192 licensure;
193 (2) Adopt and revise rules consistent with the laws of the State of Georgia that are
194 necessary to conduct its business, carry out its duties, and administer this article;
195 (3) Examine for, approve, issue, deny, revoke, suspend, sanction, and renew the licenses
196 of applicants and radiologist assistants under this article and conduct hearings in
197 connection with these actions;
198 (4) Conduct hearings on complaints concerning violations of this article and the rules
199 adopted under this article and cause the prosecution and enjoinder of the violations;
200 (5) Establish application, examination, and certification fees;
201 (6) Establish continuing education requirements; and
202 (7) Establish the number of radiologist assistants that may be supervised by a radiologist
203 according to levels of supervision as defined by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid
204 Services.
205 43-34-337.
206 The board shall appoint an advisory committee. The advisory committee shall consist of
207 no fewer than five individuals and shall include at least one licensed physician who
208 practices radiology, three licensed radiologist assistants, and one consumer representative.
209 Members shall receive no compensation for service on the committee. The committee shall
210 have such advisory duties and responsibilities as the board may determine, including, but
211 not limited to, consulting with the board on the issuance, denial, suspension, and revocation
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 9 -

25 LC 46 1183S
212 of licenses and the promulgation of rules and regulations under this article. The initial
213 members of the advisory committee may include persons eligible for licensing under this
214 article. Subsequent advisory committee members must be licensed pursuant to this article.
215 43-34-338.
216 Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit:
217 (1) The performance of any tasks or responsibilities by any student engaged in clinical
218 training in a general hospital, provided such practice is limited to clinical training that
219 shall be carried out under the direct supervision of a radiologist;
220 (2) The performance of any tasks or responsibilities by any person licensed under this
221 title, provided such tasks or responsibilities are permitted by the article governing the
222 profession pursuant to which such person is licensed; or
223 (3) The performance of any tasks or responsibilities by any legally qualified radiologist
224 assistants of any other state or territory who is serving in the armed forces or the Public
225 Health Service of the United States or who is employed by the United States Department
226 of Veterans Affairs, while engaged in the performance of his or her duties."
227 SECTION 4.
228 This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
229 without such approval.
230 SECTION 5.
231 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 571 (SUB)
- 10 -